Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 7

Conflicting Interest Transactions

48-18-701. Part definitions.

In this part:

“Control” (including “controlled by”) means:

Having the power, directly or indirectly, to elect or remove a majority of the members of the board of directors or other governing body of an entity, whether through the ownership of voting shares or interests, by contract, or otherwise; or

Being subject to a majority of the risk of loss from the entity's activities or entitled to receive a majority of the entity's residual returns;

“Director's or officer's conflicting interest transaction” means a transaction effected or proposed to be effected by the corporation (or by an entity controlled by the corporation):

To which, at the relevant time, the director or officer is a party; or

Respecting which, at the relevant time, the director or officer had knowledge and a material financial interest known to the director or officer; or

Respecting which, at the relevant time, the director or officer knew that a related person was a party or had a material financial interest;

“Fair to the corporation” means, for purposes of § 48-18-702(b)(3), that the transaction as a whole was beneficial to the corporation, taking into appropriate account whether it was:

Fair in terms of the director's or officer's dealings with the corporation; and

Comparable to what might have been obtainable in an arm's length transaction, given the consideration paid or received by the corporation;

“Material financial interest” means a financial interest in a transaction that would reasonably be expected to impair the objectivity of the director's or officer's judgment when participating in action on the authorization of the transaction;

“Material relationship” means a familial, financial, professional, employment or other relationship that would reasonably be expected to impair the objectivity of the director's judgment when participating in the action to be taken;

“Qualified director” means a director who, at the time action is to be taken under § 48-18-703, is not a director:

As to whom the transaction is a director's or officer's conflicting interest transaction; or

Who has a material relationship with another director as to whom the transaction is a director's or officer's conflicting interest transaction;

The presence of one (1) or more of the following circumstances shall not automatically prevent a director from being a qualified director:

Nomination or election of the director to the current board by any director who is not a qualified director with respect to the matter (or by any person that has a material relationship with that director), acting alone or participating with others; or

Service as a director of another corporation of which a director who is not a qualified director with respect to the matter (or any individual who has a material relationship with that director), is or was also a director;

“Related person” means:

The director's or officer's spouse;

A child, stepchild, grandchild, parent, step parent, grandparent, sibling, step sibling, half sibling, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew (or spouse of any thereof) of the director or officer or of the director's or officer's spouse;

An individual living in the same home as the director or officer;

An entity (other than the corporation or an entity controlled by the corporation) controlled by the director or officer or any person specified in subdivisions (7)(A)-(C);

A domestic or foreign:

Business or nonprofit corporation (other than the corporation or an entity controlled by the corporation) of which the director or officer is a director but only with respect to a transaction or proposed transaction to which the corporation and the other business or nonprofit corporation are parties or proposed parties and that is a transaction or proposed transaction that is or should be considered by the board of directors of the corporation;

Unincorporated entity of which the director or officer is a general partner or a member of the governing body; or

Individual, trust or estate for whom or of which the director or officer is a trustee, guardian, personal representative or like fiduciary; or

A person that is or an entity that is controlled by, an employer of the director or officer;

“Relevant time” means:

The time at which directors' action respecting the transaction is taken in compliance with § 48-18-703; or

If the transaction is not brought before the board of directors of the corporation (or its committee) for action under § 48-18-703, at the time the corporation (or an entity controlled by the corporation) becomes legally obligated to consummate the transaction; and

“Required disclosure” means disclosure of:

The existence and nature of the director's or officer's conflicting interest; and

All facts known to the director or officer respecting the subject matter of the transaction that a director or officer free of such conflicting interest would reasonably believe to be material in deciding whether to proceed with the transaction.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 36.

48-18-702. Judicial action.

A transaction effected or proposed to be effected by the corporation (or by an entity controlled by the corporation) may not be the subject of equitable relief, or give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions against a director or officer of the corporation, in a proceeding by a shareholder or by or in the right of the corporation, on the ground that the director or officer has an interest respecting the transaction, if it is not a director's or officer's conflicting interest transaction.

A director's or officer's conflicting interest transaction may not be the subject of equitable relief, or give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions against a director or officer of the corporation, in a proceeding by a shareholder or by or in the right of the corporation, on the ground that the director or officer has an interest respecting the transaction, if:

Directors' action respecting the transaction was taken in compliance with § 48-18-703 at any time;

Shareholders' action respecting the transaction was taken in compliance with § 48-18-704 at any time; or

The transaction, judged according to the circumstances at the relevant time, is established to have been fair to the corporation.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 36.

48-18-703. Directors' action.

Directors' action respecting a director's or officer's conflicting interest transaction is effective for purposes of § 48-18-702(b)(1) if the transaction has been authorized by the affirmative vote of a majority (but no fewer than two (2)) of the qualified directors who voted on the transaction, after required disclosure by the conflicted director or officer of information not already known by such qualified directors, or after modified disclosure in compliance with subsection (b); provided, that:

The qualified directors have deliberated and voted without the participation by any other director; and

Where the action has been taken by a committee, all members of the committee were qualified directors, and either:

The committee was composed of all the qualified directors on the board of directors; or

The members of the committee were appointed by the affirmative vote of a majority of the qualified directors on the board.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), when a transaction is a director's or officer's conflicting interest transaction only because a related person described in § 48-18-701(7)(E) or (7)(F) is a part to or has a material financial interest in the transaction, the conflicted director or officer is not obligated to make required disclosure to the extent that the director or officer reasonably believes that doing so would violate a duty imposed under law, a legally enforceable obligation of confidentiality, or a professional ethics rule; provided, that the conflicted director or officer discloses to the qualified directors voting on the transaction:

All the information required to be disclosed that is not so violative;

The existence and nature of the director's or officer's conflicting interest; and

The nature of the conflicted director's or officer's duty not to disclose the confidential information.

A majority (but no fewer than two (2)) of all the qualified directors on the board of directors, or on the committee, constitutes a quorum for purposes of action that complies with this section.

Where directors' action under this section does not satisfy a quorum or voting requirement applicable to the authorization of the transaction by reason of the charter, the bylaws or a provision of law, independent action to satisfy those authorization requirements must be taken by the board of directors or a committee, in which action directors who are not qualified directors may participate.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 36.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

48-18-704. Shareholders' action.

Shareholders' action respecting a director's or officer's conflicting interest transaction is effective for purposes of § 48-18-702(b)(2) if a majority of the votes cast by the holders of all qualified shares are in favor of the transaction after:

Notice to shareholders describing the action to be taken respecting the transaction;

Provision to the corporation of the information referred to in subsection (b); and

Communication to the shareholders entitled to vote on the transaction of the information that is the subject of required disclosure, to the extent the information is not known by them.

A director or officer who has conflicting interest respecting the transaction shall, before the shareholders' vote, inform the secretary or other officer or agent of the corporation authorized to tabulate votes, in writing, of the number of shares that the director or officer knows are not qualified shares under subsection (c), and the identity of the holders of those shares.

For purposes of this section:

“Holder” means, and “held by” refers to, shares held by both a record shareholder (as defined in § 48-23-101) and a beneficial shareholder (as defined in § 48-23-101); and

“Qualified shares” means all shares entitled to be voted with respect to the transaction except for shares that the secretary or other officer or agent of the corporation authorized to tabulate votes either knows, or under subsection (b) is notified, are held by:

A director or officer who has a conflicting interest respecting the transaction; or

A related person of the director or officer (excluding a person described in § 48-18-701(7)(F)).

A majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the holders of all qualified shares constitutes a quorum for purposes of compliance with this section. Subject to subsection (e), shareholders' action that otherwise complies with this section is not affected by the presence of holders, or by the voting, of shares that are not qualified shares.

If a shareholders' vote does not comply with subsection (a) solely because of a director's or officer's failure to comply with subsection (b), and if the director or officer establishes that the failure was not intended to influence and did not in fact determine the outcome of the vote, the court may take such action respecting the transaction and the director or officer, and may give such effect, if any, to the shareholders' vote, as the court considers appropriate in the circumstances.

Where shareholders' action under this section does not satisfy a quorum or voting requirement applicable to the authorization of the transaction by reason of the charter, the bylaws or a provision of law, independent action to satisfy those authorization requirements must be taken by the shareholders, in which action shares that are not qualified shares may participate.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 36.